Nebraska, session 109, LB125.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1418.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-1418.01 For purposes of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.07:
(1) Alternative nicotine product means any noncombustible product
containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human
consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any
other means. Alternative nicotine product does not include any electronic
nicotine delivery system, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or
any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and
Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act;
(2) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended
to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of
or contains (a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance
not containing tobacco, (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in
the product which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in
the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette, or (c) any roll of tobacco
wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its
appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and
labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a
cigarette described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section;
(3) Delivery sale means to sell, give, or furnish products (a) by
mail or delivery service, (b) through the Internet or a computer network,
(c) by telephone, or (d) through any other electronic method;
(4)(a) Electronic nicotine delivery system means any product or
device containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives that employs a heating element, power source, electronic
circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless
of shape or size, to simulate smoking by delivering the nicotine,
nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist,
-2-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
gas, or aerosol form to a person inhaling from the product or device.
(b) Electronic nicotine delivery system includes, but is not limited
to, the following:
(i) Any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco,
or tobacco derivatives, whether sold separately or sold in combination
with a product or device that is intended to deliver to a person
nicotine, nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor,
fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form;
(ii) Any product or device marketed, manufactured, distributed, or
sold as an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo,
electronic pipe, electronic hookah, or similar products, names,
descriptors, or devices; and
(iii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue,
tobacco, or tobacco derivatives.
(c) Electronic nicotine delivery system does not include the
following:
(i) An alternative nicotine product, cigarette, cigar, or other
tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the
United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(ii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when not sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue,
tobacco, or tobacco derivatives;
(5) Nicotine analogue means a substance that has:
(a) A chemical structure substantially similar to nicotine; or
(b) An effect on the central nervous system that is substantially
similar to, or greater than, the effect on the central nervous system of
nicotine;
-3-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
(6) (5) Self-service display means a retail display that contains a
tobacco product, a tobacco-derived product, an electronic nicotine
delivery system, or an alternative nicotine product and is located in an
area openly accessible to a retailer's customers and from which such
customers can readily access the product without the assistance of a
salesperson. Self-service display does not include a display case that
holds tobacco products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine
delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products behind locked doors;
and
(7) (6) Tobacco specialty store means a retail store that (a)
derives at least seventy-five percent of its revenue from tobacco
products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems,
or alternative nicotine products and (b) does not permit persons under
the age of twenty-one years to enter the premises unless accompanied by a
parent or legal guardian.
Sec. 2. Section 77-4001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4001 Sections 77-4001 to 77-4025 and sections 4 and 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
Sec. 3. Section 77-4002, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4002 For purposes of the Tobacco Products Tax Act, unless the
context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-4003 to
77-4007 and sections 4 and 6 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 4. Alternative nicotine product has the same meaning as in
section 28-1418.01.
Sec. 5. Section 77-4003.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4003.01 Consumable material means any liquid solution or other
material containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is depleted as
an electronic nicotine delivery system is used.
-4-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Nicotine analogue has the same meaning as in section
28-1418.01.
Sec. 7. Section 77-4007, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4007 (1) Tobacco products means (a) shall mean (1) cigars, (b)
(2) cheroots, (c) (3) stogies, (d) (4) periques, (e) (5) granulated, plug
cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco, (f) (6) snuff,
(g) (7) snuff flour, (h) (8) cavendish, (i) (9) plug and twist tobacco,
(j) (10) fine cut and other chewing tobacco, (k) (11) shorts, refuse
scraps, clippings, cuttings, and sweepings of tobacco, (l) (12) other
kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for
chewing or smoking in a pipe or otherwise or both for chewing and
smoking, (m) any alternative nicotine product and (n) (13) electronic
nicotine delivery systems.
(2) Tobacco , except that tobacco products does not include shall
not mean cigarettes as defined in section 77-2601.
Sec. 8. Section 77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4008 (1)(a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the first owner of
tobacco products to be sold in this state.
(b) The tax on snuff shall be forty-four cents per ounce and a
proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an ounce.
Such tax shall be computed based on the net weight as listed by the
manufacturer.
(c) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
three milliliters or less of consumable material shall be five cents per
milliliter of consumable material and a proportionate tax at the like
rate on all fractional parts of a milliliter.
(d) The tax on an electronic nicotine delivery system containing
more than three milliliters of consumable material shall be ten percent
of (i) the purchase price of such electronic nicotine delivery system
-5-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
paid by the first owner or (ii) the price at which the first owner who
made, manufactured, or fabricated the electronic nicotine delivery system
sells the item to others.
(e) For electronic nicotine delivery systems in the possession of
retail dealers for which tax has not been paid, the tax under this
subsection shall be imposed at the earliest time the retail dealer: (i)
Brings or causes to be brought into the state any electronic nicotine
delivery system for sale; (ii) makes, manufactures, or fabricates any
electronic nicotine delivery system in this state for sale in this state;
or (iii) sells any electronic nicotine delivery system to consumers
within this state.
(f) The tax on alternative nicotine products shall be twenty percent
of (i) the purchase price of such products paid by the first owner or
(ii) the price at which a first owner who made, manufactured, or
fabricated the product sells the items to others.
(g) (f) The tax on tobacco products not otherwise provided for in
this section other than snuff and electronic nicotine delivery systems
shall be twenty percent of (i) the purchase price of such tobacco
products paid by the first owner or (ii) the price at which a first owner
who made, manufactured, or fabricated the tobacco product sells the items
to others.
(h) (g) The tax on tobacco products shall be in addition to all
other taxes.
(2) Whenever any person who is licensed under section 77-4009
purchases tobacco products from another person licensed under section
77-4009, the seller shall be liable for the payment of the tax.
(3) Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be used and
distributed pursuant to section 77-4025.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. Original sections 28-1418.01, 77-4001, 77-4002,
77-4003.01, 77-4007, and 77-4008, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-6-

LB125 LB125
2025 2025
2024, are repealed.
-7-